fst/morphology/test/gt-norm-yamls/V-AI-atoskew_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  
  Verb - atoskêw - ok : # Ordinary AI verb - Wolvengrey p. 395; Fut+Def from Okimāsis p. 36 

  
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+1Sg:    nitatoskân # INDEPENDENT
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+2Sg:    kitatoskân
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+3Sg:    atoskêw
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: atoskêyiwa
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+1Pl:    nitatoskânân
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+21Pl:   [kitatoskânaw, kitatoskânânaw]
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+2Pl:    kitatoskânâwâw
     atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+3Pl:    atoskêwak

     PV/ê+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg:    ê-atoskêyân # CONJUNCT
     PV/ê+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg:    ê-atoskêyan
     PV/ê+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg:    ê-atoskêt
     PV/ê+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ê-atoskêyit
     PV/ê+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl:    ê-atoskêyâhk
     PV/ê+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+21Pl:   ê-atoskêyahk
     PV/ê+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl:    ê-atoskêyêk
     PV/ê+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl:    ê-atoskêcik

     PV/kî+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+1Sg:    nikî-atoskân # PRT-INDEPENDENT
     PV/kî+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+2Sg:    kikî-atoskân
     PV/kî+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+3Sg:    kî-atoskêw
     PV/kî+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: kî-atoskêyiwa
     PV/kî+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+1Pl:    nikî-atoskânân
     PV/kî+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+21Pl:   [kikî-atoskânaw, kikî-atoskânânaw]
     PV/kî+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+2Pl:    kikî-atoskânâwâw
     PV/kî+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+3Pl:    kî-atoskêwak

     PV/ê+PV/kî+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg:    ê-kî-atoskêyân # PRT-CONJUNCT
     PV/ê+PV/kî+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg:    ê-kî-atoskêyan
     PV/ê+PV/kî+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg:    ê-kî-atoskêt
     PV/ê+PV/kî+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ê-kî-atoskêyit
     PV/ê+PV/kî+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl:    ê-kî-atoskêyâhk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+21Pl:   ê-kî-atoskêyahk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl:    ê-kî-atoskêyêk
     PV/ê+PV/kî+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl:    ê-kî-atoskêcik


     PV/wî+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+1Sg:    niwî-atoskân # FUT+INT-INDEPENDENT
     PV/wî+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+2Sg:    kiwî-atoskân
     PV/wî+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+3Sg:    wî-atoskêw
     PV/wî+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: wî-atoskêyiwa
     PV/wî+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+1Pl:    niwî-atoskânân
     PV/wî+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+21Pl:   [kiwî-atoskânaw, kiwî-atoskânânaw]
     PV/wî+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+2Pl:    kiwî-atoskânâwâw
     PV/wî+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+3Pl:    wî-atoskêwak

     PV/ê+PV/wî+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+1Sg:    ê-wî-atoskêyân # FUT+INT-CONJUNCT
     PV/ê+PV/wî+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+2Sg:    ê-wî-atoskêyan
     PV/ê+PV/wî+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+3Sg:    ê-wî-atoskêt
     PV/ê+PV/wî+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+4Sg/Pl: ê-wî-atoskêyit
     PV/ê+PV/wî+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+1Pl:    ê-wî-atoskêyâhk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+21Pl:   ê-wî-atoskêyahk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+2Pl:    ê-wî-atoskêyêk
     PV/ê+PV/wî+atoskêw+V+AI+Cnj+3Pl:    ê-wî-atoskêcik

     PV/ka+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+1Sg:    nika-atoskân # FUT+DEF-INDEPENDENT
     PV/ka+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+2Sg:    kika-atoskân
     PV/ka+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+3Sg:    ka-atoskêw
     PV/ka+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+4Sg/Pl: ka-atoskêyiwa
     PV/ka+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+1Pl:    nika-atoskânân
     PV/ka+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+21Pl:   [kika-atoskânaw, kika-atoskânânaw]
     PV/ka+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+2Pl:    kika-atoskânâwâw
     PV/ka+atoskêw+V+AI+Ind+3Pl:    ka-atoskêwak
     
     atoskêw+V+AI+Cond+1Sg:    atoskêyâni
     atoskêw+V+AI+Cond+2Sg:    atoskêyani
     atoskêw+V+AI+Cond+3Sg:    atoskêci
     atoskêw+V+AI+Cond+4Sg/Pl: atoskêyici
     atoskêw+V+AI+Cond+1Pl:    atoskêyâhki
     atoskêw+V+AI+Cond+21Pl:   [atoskêyahki, atoskêyahko]
     atoskêw+V+AI+Cond+2Pl:    atoskêyêko
     atoskêw+V+AI+Cond+3Pl:    atoskêtwâwi

     atoskêw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Sg:  atoskê
     atoskêw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+21Pl: atoskêtân
     atoskêw+V+AI+Imp+Imm+2Pl:  atoskêk


     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3SgO: [niwî-wîtatoskêmâw, niwî-wîci-atoskêmâw] # com SET I
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3SgO: [kiwî-wîtatoskêmâw, kiwî-wîci-atoskêmâw]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3SgO: [niwî-wîtatoskêmânân, niwî-wîci-atoskêmânân]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+21Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîtatoskêmânaw, kiwî-wîci-atoskêmânaw]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3SgO: [kiwî-wîtatoskêmâwâw, kiwî-wîci-atoskêmâwâw]
     
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+3PlO: [niwî-wîtatoskêmâwak, niwî-wîci-atoskêmâwak] # com SET I-Pl
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+3PlO: [kiwî-wîtatoskêmâwak, kiwî-wîci-atoskêmâwak]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+3PlO: [niwî-wîtatoskêmânânak, niwî-wîci-atoskêmânânak]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+21Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîtatoskêmânawak, kiwî-wîci-atoskêmânawak]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+3PlO: [kiwî-wîtatoskêmâwâwak, kiwî-wîci-atoskêmâwâwak]

     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1SgO: [kiwî-wîtatoskêmin, kiwî-wîci-atoskêmin] # com SET II
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+1PlO: [kiwî-wîtatoskêminân, kiwî-wîci-atoskêminân]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1SgO: [kiwî-wîtatoskêminâwâw, kiwî-wîci-atoskêminâwâw]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+1PlO: [kiwî-wîtatoskêminân, kiwî-wîci-atoskêminân]


     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wîtatoskêmêw, wî-wîci-atoskêmêw] # com SET III
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+4Sg/PlO: [wî-wîtatoskêmêwak, wî-wîci-atoskêmêwak]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+4Sg/Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîtatoskêmêyiwa, wî-wîci-atoskêmêyiwa]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Sg+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîtatoskêmimêw, wî-wîci-atoskêmimêw] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+3Pl+5Sg/PlO: [wî-wîtatoskêmimêwak, wî-wîci-atoskêmimêwak] # From Wolvengrey P.C. 27/6/15 (See /doc/)

     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Sg+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîtatoskêmimâwa, niwî-wîci-atoskêmimâwa] # com SET IV
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Sg+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîtatoskêmimâwa, kiwî-wîci-atoskêmimâwa]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+1Pl+4Sg/PlO: [niwî-wîtatoskêmimânâna, niwî-wîci-atoskêmimânâna]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+21Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîtatoskêmimânawa, kiwî-wîci-atoskêmimânawa]
     PV/wî+PV/wîci+atoskêw+V+AI+Der/Com+V+TA+Ind+2Pl+4Sg/PlO: [kiwî-wîtatoskêmimâwâwa, kiwî-wîci-atoskêmimâwâwa]
    
     

     
